Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.400

Suicide prevention—Identification cards.

(1) Within existing resources, every public school that issues student identification cards, staff identification cards, or both, must have printed on either side of the identification cards:

(a) The contact information for a national suicide prevention organization; and

(b) The contact information for one or more campus, local, state, or national organizations specializing in suicide prevention, crisis intervention, or counseling, if available.

(2) The requirements in subsection (1) of this section apply to student identification cards and staff identification cards issued for the first time and issued to replace a damaged or lost identification card.

[ 2020 c 39 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2020 c 39: "The legislature finds that there are national and local organizations specializing in suicide prevention, crisis intervention, and counseling that provide free, confidential emotional support for people who are in suicidal crisis or emotional distress. Immediate access to these services often prevents suicide, attempted suicide, and other harm. The federal government recognized the importance of free support services when, in 2005, it launched a ten digit national suicide prevention lifeline and then, in 2019, it announced plans to designate 988 as the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline. The contact information for these lifesaving services should be easily accessible to Washington residents, particularly students and the caring adults who work with them. Therefore, the legislature intends to require that contact information for suicide prevention and crisis intervention organizations be printed on student and staff identification cards." [ 2020 c 39 s 1.]